Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202690-564
Legislative Council; Legislative Services.

AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL

Program No. 122 - Legislative Services

FY2025-26FY2026-27GENERAL FUND12,751,09613,380,723CASH FUND95,00095,000FEDERAL FUND est.39,27039,270PROGRAM TOTAL12,885,36613,514,993SALARY LIMIT10,080,00010,510,430

There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26 $75,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $75,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for the purpose of ongoing health-related research and public policy development by the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature. Such funds may be used for, but shall not be limited to, hiring temporary legal research assistance, consulting and research contracts, reimbursement for necessary and appropriate expenses incurred in connection with such research and policy development, and actual and necessary travel reimbursement for task forces and committees established to conduct health policy work.

The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2025, less $935,684, is hereby reappropriated. The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30, 2026, less $921,419, is hereby reappropriated.

Laws 2026, LB1071, § 40;

Laws 2026, LB1237A, § 3.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB1071, section 40, with LB1237A, section 3, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB1071 became effective April 8, 2026. Changes made by LB1237A became effective July 18, 2026.